Florida, session 2026, SB350.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 37 38 Section 1.â Paragraph (j) of subsection (2) of section 39 119.071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 40 119.071âGeneral exemptions from inspection or copying of 41 public records.â 42 (2)âAGENCY INVESTIGATIONS.â 43 (j)1.a.âFor purposes of this subparagraph, the term: 44 (I)ââFamily memberâ means a spouse, child, parent or legal 45 guardian, or sibling. This term does not include the accused. 46 (II)ââOfficerâ means any full-time, part-time, or auxiliary 47 law enforcement officer, correctional officer, or correctional 48 probation officer certified under s. 943.13. 49 (III)ââVictimâ means a person who suffers direct or 50 threatened physical, psychological, or financial harm as a 51 result of the commission or attempted commission of a crime or 52 delinquent act or against whom the crime or delinquent act is 53 committed. The term does not include the accused. 54 b.(I)âAny portion of a public record document that reveals 55 the identity, including the name or personal identification 56 number, home or employment telephone number, home or employment 57 address, or personal assets of a the victim, or any other 58 information that could be used to locate, intimidate, harass, or 59 abuse the victim, which of a crime and identifies that person as 60 the victim of a crime, and which is a public record that is 61 generated or document is received by any agency that regularly 62 generates or receives information from or concerning the victims 63 of crime, is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 64 the State Constitution. 65 (II)âAny portion of a public record that reveals the 66 identity, including name or personal identification number, home 67 or employment telephone number, home or employment address, or 68 personal assets of the lawful representative, family member, or 69 next of kin of the person identified as a victim by the public 70 record, or any other information that could be used to locate, 71 intimidate, harass, or abuse such persons, and which is a public 72 record that is generated or received by any agency that 73 regularly generates or receives information from or concerning 74 the victims of crime, is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), 75 Art. I of the State Constitution. This exemption does not apply 76 to the accused, or to a lawful representative, family member, or 77 next of kin of a victim upon a showing that the interest of such 78 person would be in actual or potential conflict with the 79 interests of the victim. 80 (III)(A)âNotwithstanding sub-sub-subparagraph 81 (2)(j)1.b.(I), the portion of a public record exempted under 82 sub-sub-subparagraph (2)(j)1.b.(I) which contains the name of an 83 officer who became a victim in the course and scope of the 84 officerâs employment or official duties is confidential and 85 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 86 Constitution for the first 72 hours after the incident in which 87 the officer became a victim. These portions of a public record 88 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 89 Constitution for an additional 60 days after the expiration of 90 the 72-hour period. After the expiration of the 60-day period, 91 the portion of a public record which contains the name of an 92 officer who became a victim in the course and scope of his or 93 her employment or official duties and which identifies the 94 officer as a victim is no longer exempt. 95 (B)âSub-sub-sub-subparagraph (2)(j)1.b.(III)(A) does not 96 supersede the exemption provided for victims of sexual battery 97 in sub-subparagraph (2)(h)1.b. 98 (IV)âThis sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open 99 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 100 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and 101 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. If, 102 after review, this sub-subparagraph is not reenacted, the text 103 of this sub-subparagraph shall revert to that in existence on 104 June 30, 2026, except that any amendments to this sub 105 subparagraph enacted other than by this act shall be preserved 106 and continue to operate to the extent that such amendments are 107 not dependent upon the amendments to the sub-subparagraph made 108 by this act. 109 c.âAny information not otherwise held confidential or 110 exempt from s. 119.07(1) which reveals the home or employment 111 telephone number, home or employment address, or personal assets 112 of a person who has been the victim of sexual battery, 113 aggravated child abuse, aggravated stalking, harassment, 114 aggravated battery, or domestic violence is exempt from s. 115 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution, upon 116 written request by the victim, which must include official 117 verification that an applicable crime has occurred. Such 118 information shall cease to be exempt 5 years after the receipt 119 of the written request. 120 d.âAny state or federal agency that is authorized to have 121 access to such documents by any provision of law shall be 122 granted such access in the furtherance of such agencyâs 123 statutory duties, notwithstanding this section. 124 2.a.âAny information in a videotaped statement of a minor 125 who is alleged to be or who is a victim of sexual battery, lewd 126 acts, or other sexual misconduct proscribed in chapter 800 or in 127 s. 794.011, s. 827.071, s. 847.012, s. 847.0125, s. 847.013, s. 128 847.0133, or s. 847.0145, which reveals that minorâs identity, 129 including, but not limited to, the minorâs face; the minorâs 130 home, school, church, or employment telephone number; the 131 minorâs home, school, church, or employment address; the name of 132 the minorâs school, church, or place of employment; or the 133 personal assets of the minor; and which identifies that minor as 134 the victim of a crime described in this subparagraph, held by a 135 law enforcement agency, is confidential and exempt from s. 136 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. Any 137 governmental agency that is authorized to have access to such 138 statements by any provision of law shall be granted such access 139 in the furtherance of the agencyâs statutory duties, 140 notwithstanding the provisions of this section. 141 b.âA public employee or officer who has access to a 142 videotaped statement of a minor who is alleged to be or who is a 143 victim of sexual battery, lewd acts, or other sexual misconduct 144 proscribed in chapter 800 or in s. 794.011, s. 827.071, s. 145 847.012, s. 847.0125, s. 847.013, s. 847.0133, or s. 847.0145 146 may not willfully and knowingly disclose videotaped information 147 that reveals the minorâs identity to a person who is not 148 assisting in the investigation or prosecution of the alleged 149 offense or to any person other than the defendant, the 150 defendantâs attorney, or a person specified in an order entered 151 by the court having jurisdiction of the alleged offense. A 152 person who violates this provision commits a misdemeanor of the 153 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 154 775.083. 155 Section 2.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 156 necessity that the following information held by an agency that 157 regularly generates or receives information from or concerning 158 victims of crime be made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida 159 Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution: 160 (a)âThe portions of public records that identify a person 161 as a victim of a crime, or any other information that could be 162 used to locate, intimidate, harass, or abuse a victim. 163 (b) The portions of public records that reveal the identity 164 of the lawful representative, family member, or next of kin of a 165 person identified as a victim by the public record, or any other 166 information that could be used to locate, intimidate, harass, or 167 abuse such persons. 168 (2)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public necessity 169 that the portion of public records that is held by an agency 170 that regularly generates or receives information from or 171 concerning victims of crime which contains the name of an 172 officer who became a victim in the course and scope of the 173 officerâs employment or official duties be made confidential and 174 exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes and s. 24(a), Art. I 175 of the State Constitution for a 72-hour period after the 176 incident in which the officer became a victim. The Legislature 177 further finds it is a public necessity that these portions of a 178 public record be exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and 179 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution for an additional 60 180 days after the expiration of the 72-hour period. 181 (3)âVictims, their lawful representative, family member, 182 and next of kin, have a right to be free from intimidation, 183 harassment, and abuse. Community attention is often piqued when 184 a person becomes a victim, which may lead to the undue intrusion 185 into the personâs privacy, as well as his or her lawful 186 representative, family members, or next of kin. The identifying 187 information of such persons could be used to further traumatize 188 them. The risk of additional harm or harassment outweighs any 189 public benefit that may be derived from the public disclosure of 190 such information. The Legislature also finds that the release of 191 such portions of records may deter crime victims from 192 cooperating with law enforcement and reporting criminal acts 193 based on a victimâs fear of additional retaliation or attention. 194 This exemption is narrowly tailored to balance the publicâs 195 right to access public records by allowing the release of the 196 name of a law enforcement officer who becomes a victim within 197 the course and scope of his or her employment or duties 63 days 198 after the incident. The risk of additional harm or harassment 199 outweighs any public benefit that may be derived from the public 200 disclosure of such information. 201 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.